Vermont, session 2025-2026, H233.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. GRANT APPLICATIONS AND AGREEMENTS; INDIRECT
RATES FOR NONPROFITS; BULLETIN 5
On or before July 1, 2025, the Secretary of Administration shall include in
Administrative Bulletin 5, Policy for Grant Issuance and Monitoring, a
uniform formula and approval process for use in all State-funded grants for
nonprofit corporations to use an indirect rate higher than the standard de
minimis rate, pursuant to 2 C.F.R. § 200.332(b)(4).
Sec. 2. PROMPT EXECUTION OF GRANT AGREEMENTS AND
PROMPT PAYMENT OF GRANT FUNDS; REPORTING;
BULLETIN UPDATE
(a) Execution of grant agreements.
(1) A State agency shall execute a State-funded grant agreement with an
organization not later than 30 days after:
(A) funds are appropriated in the budget to the agency for the
purposes of a grant agreement between the agency and organization; or
(B) notice, either written or verbal, of an award of a State-funded
grant is provided by the granting agency to the organization.
(2) If a granting agency is unable to execute a State-funded grant
agreement pursuant to the terms set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection,
VT LEG #379274 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.233
2025 Page 3 of 7
the granting agency shall submit in writing an explanation to the Agency of
Administration as to why it was unable to meet its obligation.
(b) Prompt payment.
(1) For all executed State-funded grant agreements, the granting agency
shall pay the grantee within 30 days after receipt of a valid written request for
payment from the grantee. A written request for payment from the grantee is
valid if it meets the requirements in the executed grant agreement between the
granting agency and grantee.
(2) If a granting agency is unable to promptly pay the grantee of a State-
funded grant agreement pursuant to the terms set forth in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the granting agency shall submit in writing an explanation to the
Agency of Administration as to why it was unable to meet its obligation.
(c) Reporting. The Agency of Administration shall:
(1) create an online form on its website where grantees awarded State-
funded grants are able to provide notice that a granting agency did not timely:
(A) execute a State-funded grant agreement pursuant to subdivision
(a)(1) of this section; or
(B) pay the grantee upon receiving a valid written request for
payment pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section; and
VT LEG #379274 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.233
2025 Page 4 of 7
(2) create a publicly accessible database on its website that displays all
nonconfidential information submitted by grantees pursuant to subdivision (1)
of this subsection.
(d) Update bulletin. On or before July 1, 2025, the Secretary of
Administration shall update Administrative Bulletin 5, Policy for Grant
Issuance and Monitoring, with the language provided in this section.
Sec. 3. WORKING GROUP ON STATE GRANT PROCESSES
(a) Creation. There is created the Working Group on State Grant Processes
for the purpose of assessing the State’s current grant awarding procedures.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Secretary of Administration or designee;
(2) one representative of Common Good Vermont, selected by the
Director of Common Good Vermont;
(3) two representatives, each of different nonprofit organizations,
selected by the Director of Common Good Vermont, who have received a
State-funded grant within 12 months of July 1, 2025;
(4) one member of the Vermont House of Representatives, appointed by
the Speaker of the House;
(5) one member of the Vermont Senate, appointed by the Senate
Committee on Committees; and
VT LEG #379274 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.233
2025 Page 5 of 7
(6) one representative of the Department of Finance and Management,
appointed by the Governor.
(c) Meetings.
(1) The Secretary of Administration or designee shall call the first
meeting of the Working Group to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) The Working Group shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Working Group shall meet not fewer than eight times.
(5) The Chair may establish subcommittees to perform the work set
forth in this section.
(d) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall:
(1) assess the State’s current grant and contracting funding levels and
determine whether the State should review cost of living or other inflationary
adjustments on a regular basis;
(2) assess, due to delayed reimbursement from granting agencies, how
the need to obtain bridge loans and lines of credit have impacted nonprofits
and their ability to provide services to the State;
(3) assess the grant and contracting processes of the Agency of Human
Services to identify best practices and areas needing improvement;
VT LEG #379274 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.233
2025 Page 6 of 7
(4) determine how to increase the number of State-funded grants that do
not require reimbursement;
(5) recommend solutions to improve reimbursement practices and
processes of State-funded grants;
(6) identify system improvements that would simplify the State-funded
grant application and reporting processes;
(7) examine ways to ensure consistency between State and federal
indirect rates, including:
(A) reviewing the process for nonprofit organizations to qualify for
an indirect rate above the standard rate; and
(B) honoring federal indirect rates;
(8) analyze the impact of State-funded grants being executed more than
30 days after a notice of award is issued;
(9) analyze the impact of agencies not paying grantees within 30 days
after receiving a written request for payment on a grant; and
(10) consider related issues that arise during the course of the Working
Group’s duties as set forth in this section.
(e) Assistance. The Working Group shall have the administrative and
technical assistance of the Joint Fiscal Office and the administrative, legal, and
technical assistance of the Agency of Administration.
VT LEG #379274 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.233
2025 Page 7 of 7
(f) Reporting. The Working Group shall submit a written report to the
House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the
Senate Committee on Government Operations with its recommendations based
on the analysis conducted pursuant to this section on or before September 1,
2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Working Group serving in the
member’s capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation
and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than
eight meetings.
(2) Other members of the Working Group shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than eight meetings.
(3) Payments to members of the Working Group authorized under this
subsection shall be made from monies appropriated to the General Assembly.
(h) Expiration. The Working Group shall cease to exist on December 31,
2026.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379274 v.1